Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-2808
Purpose of sections.

The purpose of sections 39-2808 to 39-2824 is to provide a contracting agency alternative methods of contracting for public projects. The alternative methods of contracting shall be available to a contracting agency for use on any project regardless of the funding source. Notwithstanding any other provision of state law to the contrary, the Transportation Innovation Act shall govern the design-build, progressive design-build, and construction manager-general contractor procurement processes.

Laws 2016, LB960, § 8;

Laws 2019, LB583, § 3;

Laws 2022, LB1016, § 3.